external/hyphenation-patterns/de/hyph-de-1901.pat.txt
.ab1a
.ab3l
.abo2
.ab3ol
.ab1or
.abs2
.ack2
.ae3
.aft2
.ag2a
.ag4r
.ag2u
.ai2s
.akt2a
.al3d
.al2e
.al3k
.al5len
.al3se
.al4tei
.alt1s
.al2tu
.ampe4
.amt2s
.amt4sc
.ana1c
.an3d2
.anden6k
.and4ri
.an1er
.ang2
.an3gli
.an3go
.ang4s2
.angst3
.an3k4
.an3na
.an3s2
.an4si.
.an3z2
.aos4
.ap5p6le.
.aps2
.ari1e
.ar3k2a
.ar4m3ac
.ar4mun
.ar2sc
.ar4tan
.ar4t3ei
.arter4
.ar6t5erh
.arz2
.as6sest
.ata1
.ate2
.at4h
.au3d
.aue2
.au4f3
.aufs2
.au2s1
.au6stes
.ax2
.äm3
.är6schl
.ät2s
.äu3
.bahn1
.bah6ner6
.baus4
.be3erb
.bel2a
.be3r2a
.be3r2e
.ber4g3a
.ber6g5e6b
.ber4g3r
.ber4tr
.bik2
.bi4os
.bi2t
.bit1a
.boge2
.bo4s3k
.bu4ser
.bus3se
.bu7s8ser.
.ch4
.char8me.
.char8mes
.chi3er
.dab4
.da2r1
.da4rin
.darm1
.da4te.
.da4tes
.de2al
.dein2
.de4in.
.de3lo
.de8ments
.den4ka
.de1o2
.de3r4en
.derma3
.dermas6
.de3sk
.di2a
.di3el
.dien2
.dien8sta
.dienst7a8d
.do3b
.do2mo
.do1pe
.dor2f1
.dy4s3
.ebe2r1
.ehe1i
.ei3e2
.ei3f2e
.ei3k
.einbus6
.ein3d
.eine2
.ei4neb
.ein4er
.eins2
.eise4
.ei2sp
.ei4s1t
.ei2tr
.eke2
.ek3li
.el2bi
.el2bl
.el4fei
.el2fl
.el2i
.em3m2
.en1
.en4da
.en4d3er4
.en2d3r
.en2gl
.enn2
.ent3
.en2ta
.en4tei
.en7thalp
.en4tio
.en2t1r
.epi1
.ep3p
.er8brecht
.er2bu
.er4dan
.er4dei
.erden6k
.er4dep
.er4der
.er1e
.ere3c
.erf4
.er1i
.ers2
.er8stein
.erster6
.er8sterb
.er8stritt.
.er8stritten.
.ert2
.er4z3el
.er4zen4
.ese3le
.es3p
.es3say
.es2st
.es2t
.est6e
.est4h
.est3r
.et2s
.eu1
.eu3g4
.eu3t
.ext4
.fe3la
.fer4no
.fe4sta
.fid2
.fi4le.
.fi4len
.fi2s
.flö8s7se.
.flö8s7sen.
.flö8sses
.fs4
.fu2sc
.gangs4
.ga4sen
.ga2t
.gd2
.geb2l
.gel2d1
.ge3lu
.ge5nar
.ge3n4e
.ge3n2o
.ge3r2a
.ge3r2e
.ge3s2
.get4
.ge3u
.grif8fes
.gus2
.haft3s
.hal5le
.hal2s
.han2f
.hau4sa
.hau2t1
.he2
.he4bei
.he3fe
.he3le
.her3an
.her6b5ra
.he3ri
.he6r5inn
.hin3u
.hof1e
.ho4fen
.ho4met
.ia2
.il3
.im2a
.ima4ge
.im5m
.in3
.ink2
.inn2e
.inu1
.ioni1
.ire3
.is2a
.it2h
.iv2
.ivo3
.joni1
.jor3
.ka2b5l
.ka2i
.ka3le
.kal4o
.kampfer8f
.kampfer8p
.ka3ta
.ka4t3io
.ken6num
.ke1ra
.ker3s
.ki4e
.klang3
.ko3b
.kopf1
.kor4da
.ks2
.kus2
.la3be
.la3ho
.le4ar
.le4gas
.le3n6i
.len3z
.lich8t7er8s
.li2f
.li3po
.li4ve.
.lo4g3in
.loss2
.lo3ver
.lö4ss
.lös3se
.lus2
.luster6
.lu4str
.lut4h
.ma3d
.ma3ge
.mal4e
.ma4str
.matu3
.md2
.me3l2a
.me3ne
.me3no
.men8schl
.men8schw
.ment4
.mes4sp
.mi2f
.mil2z
.mi2t1
.mm2
.mo2i
.mund3a
.na3t
.näs5c
.nebe4n
.ner2f
.ne1ro
.nich2
.nicht5e
.ni2e
.ni3k4l
.nob4
.no2c
.no2s
.no4th
.nul2
.nus2
.ob1a
.of2e
.ohr5s
.oper4
.or2a
.ort2
.ort4h
.orts3e
.os3s
.os5t6alg
.oste2
.ost3el
.ost5end
.osten8de
.oste6re
.ost3r
.ot1
.ozo4
.öl3l
.pa2r1e
.par3t4h
.pe2c
.pe3la
.pe3le
.pe4ste
.pf4
.ph4
.poka2
.po6stei
.po4str
.ps2
.rabe4
.ra3me
.ra4sp
.ra4s3s
.rau2m
.räu3sc
.re3ale
.reb3s2
.re3cha
.rein4t
.reis6ei
.reli1
.res2t
.re4stu
.ri2as
.ro4a
.ro3be
.ro2ha
.roll4e
.ro3m4a
.ro2tr
.ro3tu
.rö2sc
.rö4ss
.rös3se
.ruh2r1
.runder6
.ru5s6ses
.rü1b
.rücker6
.rü4ss
.sa3br
.sali1
.sami3
.sas2
.sa3sse
.sau1c
.sau4er
.sau5er.
.sä5s4
.sch4
.scheiner8
.scho7s8se.
.scho7s8ses.
.se2ha
.sein2
.sen3s
.se1ro
.se2t1
.sha2
.si2te
.ski1e
.spä5s4
.spiege8lei
.st4
.steiner8k
.sto4re
.stras4
.sucher6
.tage4s
.tan4k3l
.ta3ra
.tar3t
.ta2th
.ta2to
.ta2t1u
.te2e
.te2f
.tehe3
.te3le
.te3no
.te6stel
.tester8h
.tex4tr
.th4
.ti2a
.ti2e
.ti2me
.ti4mes
.ti2s
.tode4
.to4der
.to2n
.to3nes
.to4nin
.to4pl
.to2pr
.to2w
.tras3
.tra4ss
.tri3e4s
.ts2
.tu3ra
.tu3ri
.tur4ma
.ub2
.ufe2
.ufer1
.ul2b3
.um3
.ume2
.umo2
.ums2
.un3a2
.un3d
.une4
.un3g
.uni2t
.ural4
.ur1c
.ur1e
.ur3o4m
.ur1o2p
.ur3s2
.ut2a
.ut3r
.übe4
.ve5n2e
.vi2e
.vol2
.vo4r
.wah4l
.wa2s
.weg5s
.wei4ta
.welter8e
.welter8k
.wer4kr
.wetterer8
.wi4e
.wor2
.wort5en6
.xe3
.ya4l
.zahn3
.zeit3s
.zel4la4
.zelle4
.zel6lei
.zel4li
.ze1ro
.zi2e
.zie4l3u
.zin4ka
.zin4st
.zol2
.zuch2
a1ab
aa2be
aa1c
a1a2ce
aa2gr
2a1a2n
2a1aq
2a2ar
aa2r1a
aar3b
aa2rei
aar3f4
aar3g2
aar3k4
aar3t4
1aas
aas1t
aa2th
aa2t3r
aat4s1
2a3au
a1ä
a1b
2abab
ab2ak
2abal
ab2am
ab2an
ab1au
ab2aut
ab1ä
ab2äu
1abd
2a3be.
4a3bec
abe1e
ab1eil
2ab2el
abe2la
abela4d
abe2le
abe4lin
1abent
2aber
a3beri
ab1er2k
ab1er2r
ab1er2z
2abes
ab3esse
abes2t
ab1eß
2ab2et
2abew
1abf
1abg
3abga
1abh
2abi
4abil
ab1ins
ab1ir
3ab1it
1abk
ab1l
1a2bla
a4blag
a3blat
a4blau
1a2blä
ab4le.
3ab3lei
2ablet
ab3li
a2blin
ab4lit
2ab4lo
1a2blö
2ablu
abma3s
1abn
2a3bo
3a4bo.
ab2of
3a4bon
4abot
2abö
ab3r
a4brä
a2bre
2abro
2abrö
1absc
ab3s2i
1ab3s2p
abs2t2
1absta
ab3sz
1abtei
3abtr
2abu
a2bum
ab1ur
2abü
1abw
2aby
3abz
2a3ca
2ac1c
a1cem
a1cen
a2ceo
a1cet
2ach.
ach1a
a1chal
a3chari
ach3as
ach3au
2achb
a1che
a2ch1e2c
ach1ei
ach4ei.
a4cherf
a4ch3erh
a4cherk
a4cherö
a4ch3erw
2achf
a1chi
a2chim
ach3l
2ach3m
ach3n
a1cho
a3cho.
ach1ob
acho2r
ach3ö
2ach3r
2achsc
achs4el
ach3s2i
ach3su
a4cht
ach4tak
ach6ter6h
achter6n
acht6err
ach4t3in
ach2t1o
ach8traum
ach8träume.
ach8träumen.
ach6trit
ach4tum
a1chu
ach1u2f
ach3ü
2achv
4ach1w
a1ci
4ack.
ackmu4
ackmus3
ack2sp
acksta4
2a1cl
a3co
acon4n
2acu
a1ç
a1d
2ad.
4adab
a2dac
a2dad
ad2ag
adai4
ad1ama
a2d1an
3adap
4a3d2a2r3
a2d1au
a3dau.
4adav
1a2dä
ad1c
1add
ad2e
2ade.
ade2al
a3dee
adefi4
2adeg
4aden
a3dena
a2deri
4ades
ade3s2p
ades4s
2adf
4adh
4adi
adi3en
adie4sc
3adj
3admi
4admu
ad2ob
1a2dop
2adp
2adq
2ad3rec
ad3rei
ad3run
2ads2
ad3sz
2ad2t1
adte2
adt3h
1adv
2a1e1
ae2b
a2ec
a3e2d
a3e2i
a2ek
a3el.
a2ela
a2ele
a2eli
a3els
ae2m
ae2o3
a3e2p
a3er.
3a2er2o
ae3s
aes2a
ae4sc
a2et
a2ew
ae2x
2afa
af1ab
a2f1a2n
a3far
a2f1au4
2afä
2afe
a2f1ec
aff4a
af2f3l
af4flu
2afi
afi6kanz
2af3l
a1flu
2afo
af2ob
a2ford
2afra
af3rau
af3rä
af3re
2afro
af3rö
af4rü
af3s2a
af3s2h
af2si
af2sp
af2t1a
af2tei
af2te2l
aft4erk
af2to
af2tö
aft3r
af2tra
af2t5re
af2tur
a2f3ur
2afü
a1g
2ag.
2aga
ag1a2b
ag1a2d
ag1am
ag1ar
a2g1au
agd1
ag2di
ag2do
ag2dr
ag2du
2age.
age1i
agel1e
age4ler
2agen.
age4na
age4neb
a2gent
2ages
age4sau
age4s3i
age2s3p
ages5s
ages6sen
age4s3ti
3aggr
a2g1id
a2gim
2a2g1l
ag4lan
a4glö
2agm
ag2n
ag4nat
a4gnä
ag4ne.
ag4nu
a2grä
a2g3re
a2g3ri
ag4ro
2ags
ag3sah
ag4sam
ag3seid
ags8porta
ag4sti
ag2s1tr
2agt
ag2th
2agu
a2gund
2ah.
a1ha
ah2an
ah4at
a1hä
2a1he
ahe1in
a2h1erh
a1h2i
ahin3
ah2l3a2
ah4l1ei
ahle4na
ah4l3erd
ah4l3erh
ah2lö
ahl3sz
ahme1i
ah3mu
ah4n1a
ah2nä
ah3nee
ahner4e
ahn3ern
ah2nin
ah2no
1a2hor
ah1os
a2h3ö
ahr1a
ah3r2e
ahre4s3
ah3ri
ahr2ti
ahr4tri
ah2ta
ah2te2l
ah2t1ex
ah2t5r
aht1s
a1hu
ah1w
a1hy
ai1a4
a1ia.
2aib
ai2bl
aid4s
aids1t
ai1e4
ai3en1
aif4
ai1fr
ai3g4
a1ik.
ai3ke
ai2lar
ai2lei
ai2lo
ail3s
4ain
ain2a
a1ind
a4i3n4e
a1ing
ain3s
ai2sa
a3isch.
ai5schw
ai3s2e
ais3sen
ais5st
ait4
a1iv.
a1ivl
a1ivs
a1j
a2jat
2ak.
2aka3b4
a2k4a3d2
2akal
2a3kam
2akar
ak4at
ak2au
1akaz
2akb
2akc
2akd
2a1ke
a2k1em
aken2n
a2k1ent
a2kes
a2keu
4a1ki
ak1ins
2ak3l
ak4li
2ako
2a1kr
ak3res
ak4ri
akro3
2aks
ak3sh
2akta
ak3tan
2aktb
ak2tel
ak3ten
ak5t2er
2aktm
ak2t3r
ak3t4ri
2aktsi
2aktsp
2aktst
2aktw
a1ku
2akun
a2kup
2akur
3a2kut
4a3kü
1akz
a1la
2ala.
2a2labo
al2abr
al1ad
al1af
al1age
al1am
al1ana
2aland
a2lang
al1anz
a3lar.
a3lare
al2arm
2al3arr
ala2s
al1a4si
al1ass
2alat
al1au
al3aug
a1lä
a2l1äm
al1är
al1äu
al4bel
al4berh
al4b3er4w
al2b3l
al2boh
alb3ru
alb5st
al2dä
al4d3erl
al4d3ern
alde2s
al2dr
2ale
4ale.
ale4ar
al1eb
ale2be
al1ec
3a4l1ef
a4l1eh
a2l1ei
a3leic
a4lein
a3lek
a2l1el
4alem
alen1
4a3len.
3alenc
alende4
a4l3ends
a2leng
al2enn
ale2p
al1epo
4aler.
a2l1erb
a2l1erf
a2l1erh
aler4kl
a2l3erl
aler4mi
a2l1er4r
a2l1ert
4ales
a2l1e4sk
a2less
a2l1eu
alf4r
2alg.
3algi
al2gli
1algo
3algor
2ali
al2imb
ali4nal
al1ind
al1ins
alk3le
al2klö
al2kne
1alkoh
alk3s
alk5se
al2lab
alla3d
alla2m
al2lan
al2l1ap
al2l1a2r
al6later
al2lä
al3läu
al4lec
3allee
alle4gi
al4leh
al3lend
al3les
alle3se
al2leu
al2lid
alli5er.
alli7ers.
al2lob
al2lo2c
al2lop
al2lo2s
al2lö2
all3öse
al2luf
allu4s
al2lü4s
al2map
al3mas
al4m3ast
2alo
a2l1ob
3aloe
a2lof
4alog
alo2ga
alo2gr
al1ont
a2l1ö
al2ös
3alp.
3alpe.
alpe2n
1alph
al3ses
al4sh
al3skl
als2to
al2sum
al2t1ak
al2t1an
al3tart
al4temu
al4t3er3f
al2teu
al2tin
alt1op
al2tö
al2tre
al2t3ri
al2t3ro
alt4stü
a1lu
alu3b4
al2u3f
alu3g
a2lum
al1umb
al1ur
a3lus
4aly
al2zar
al2zau
alz4erk
al2zw
am2a
ama3d2
ama3g
2amah
a2malg
2a3m4an
a2m3ap
2amar
ama4sta
a2maz
2amä
2ame.
a2meb
2amel
am4e4n1
amer2a
a2meri
ame5r2u
ame3s
a4mesh
a3met
a2mew
2amf
am4i
a3mi.
a3mie
2a3mir
2a3mis
2amit
2amk
2aml
2amm.
am2ma2c
2ammal
amma2n
am2mar
am2mas
amma4sc
am2maß
am4ma4te
ammen8ge.
am2min
am2mit
am4mo2d
am2mö
ammu2
amm3unt
am4mus
am4mü
amni1
a2mö
2ampe.
2ampen
am4pf
amp2fa2
am3pl
2ample
2ampo
am3pr
am4schl
1amt.
am2t1a2
am2t1ä
am2tel
2amtem
am4t3ern
am2tex
am2tö
am2t3r
am2tu
2amu
amun3
2ana.
ana3c
anadi3
an2ag
a3nak
an3alg
ana4lin
2anam
ana3ma
2anan
an4and
2anas
a5nat.
ana4th
a5n4atm
an3aug
1an1äs
1anb
2anbu
an3ch
2and.
3an3d2ac
and3anz
and3ei
ander4e
ande4sc
an2d1ex
and4sas
and4spa
ands5paß
and2su
4andu2
an2d1ur
2andy
2ane
an3ec
a3nee
an2ei.
an3eif
3aneig
a4neis
3a2n1e4k
aner4fa
an2erh
a4nerke
4anern
1anf
2anf.
2anfab
3anfä
an3fe
2anfi
anf5rau
an3f2u
4ang.
1angab
an2g1ar
1angeb
an2g1ei
an4g3erf
an4g3er4w
an4g3erz
2angh
4angie
ang1l
an2gla
ang1r
an2g3ra
1angri
4angs.
ang3sc
angt4
1anh
2a3ni
an4i3d
4anie
ani3els
ani5ers.
anig2
ani3ke
3a4nim
an4in
a4nind
a4nins
ani2o
an3i4on
a4niso
anis2t
2anj
2ank.
an2kab
an2k1ak
an2kan
1ankä
an2kei
2anken
an4kind
an2klö
an2klu
ank3no
an2kor
ank1r
ank3ra
an4kras
ank3rä
an2kro
2anks2
ank3se
2ankt
3ankü
1anl
2anlad
anma3s2
1anmu
2ann.
1annah
an2nar
an3ne
an4nef
2anns
ann4sto
2annt
2ano.
ano3b
1an1od
anoi3
ano4ide
a3nol
ano2la
a2nom
a3nom.
a2n1or
2a3nos
2a1nö
4anpr
1anr
2anrö
an3s4ar
1an3s2ä
1ansc
an3skr
ans1pa
ans3pon
1anspr
1anst
an3s2z
2ant.
an2t1a4r
1antá
3antei
an3t2ha
an3t4he
2antie
anton2
3antr
ant3rin
an2tro
1antw
2anu
anus3s
a1nü
1anw
an2zä
2anzb
2anzd
1anzei
anze2n
2anzg
2anzh
an2zid
an2z1i4n
2anzk
2anzm
2anzr
2anzs
2anzt
1anzü
2anzv
2anzw
an2zwi
2ao
aof4
ao3i4
a1op
a1or
a1os3
aost2
a3ot.
ao3t2s
2a1ö4
a1p
2ap.
2a3pa
a2pe.
a3pel
a2pé
a2pf
ap2fa
1apfel
2apfes
a3pfl
a2pht
2api
2ap3l
ap4la
ap4lä
ap4lo
ap2n
2apol
a2pot
2apr
ap2str
ap3t2
2a3pu
2ar.
a1ra
a3ra.
ar2ab
2ar3abb
ar3abf
ar3abt
ara3d2
ar3adr
ara3ge
a2r3al
a3rale
a3ra3li
a3ralo
2aran
a2r1ang
a2r1anz
2arap
a2r3app
2arar
a3ras
a2r1au
a1rä
1arb
2arb.
2arba
ar2b1au
ar4b3ein
2arbek
2arben
2arber
4arbi
2ar2bl
2arbo
2arbr
ar2b3re
2arbs2
arb3se
arb3sk
arb3so
2arb3t4
2arbu
ar2b3un
1ar1c
2archl
2archr
ar2dau
arde2i
ar2dob
ar2dop
ard3r
ar2dro
ar2du
a2rea
ar1eff
a4reg
ar1ehr
ar1eid
a3reih
a2rein
a2rele
4arem
4aren.
are3r2a
arer2e
a2rerg
a2r1er3h
a2reri
a2rerk
a2rerl
ar2erw
are3u
2arf
ar2fä
arf1r
ar2f3ra
arf2sp
4arg.
ar3gan
ar2gl
ar2gn
2arg4o
ar3g4r
2arh
2ari
ar2ia
a2rid
ari3e2n
ari3erd
ari3erg
ari5ers.
arin3it
ar1int
a3rio
ar2ir
ari2su
a3riu
ar2kal
ar2k1ar
ark3aue
2ar2k3l
ar4klag
ar2kor
ar4kri
ark3sa
ark4se
ark3she
arku2
ar2les
arma3l
ar2mau
ar3m2ä
ar2m1eg
ar2m1ei
ar4merk
arm2or
ar2mum
4armü
ar2nan
ar3ne
arn2el
ar3ni
ar4nin
a1ro
ar1o2d
ar1of
aro2fe
a3rol
aro3m
aron4
a2r1op
a2ror
a2r1ö
2arp
arp3fe
2arr
ar2r1ad
ar2rek
arre4n
2arsa
ar3s2h
2ar3s2i
ar3sse
ar2tau
ar3t2e
2artei
artel6li6
artex2
ar2the
art4ho
art2i
2arto
art3ram
art3re
2arts
2aru
a2r1uh
ar1um
a2rü
2arv
arwa2
2ary
ar2zau
ar2zä
2arze
2arzi
ar2zö
1arzt
arz2t3r
2arzu
ar2z1w
2asa
a4s1am
asas2
asa3sse
asau2f
a2s3aug
asau2s1
a2sca
as2ch
a4schec
a2schm
2ascht
a3schu
4a3se
a4seb
a4sec
a4s1ef
as1eie
as1emi
a5sen.
ase4na
asens2
as1ent
as2er
as2es
ase2t
as1eta
a4sex
2asg
2ash
a4s3ha
as4hi
2asim
asin2g
2a5s2is
a4s3l
a4sm
a4sn
2a1so
as1o2f
a3sol
a3som
as1or
as1p
as3pek
aspek6to
a4spel
a4s2ph
a3s2pi
a4spl
as2po
as3sa
ass2ab
ass6aus.
ass2e
ass3ein
as3sel
asse3le
as3ser
asserma6
a4ss2i
as3sin
as3so
as2s1p
as3spi
as4st
ass1ti
ass1to
as5str
as5stu
2asta
a4stab
a3stä
a4s1tec
as2tee
ast2el
a4stemp
a4s3tep
ast2er
a4stese
as2tex
a4sth
a2stoc
ast3orc
as2tra
a2s2t3re
a4strol
ast5roll
a2stum
2a1su
as2ur
a3sus
a4sw
aswa2s
3a4syl
aße4
aß2en3
2a1t
at1abe
at1abr
at2a1f
a3t2a3g
a3tah
a2t1akt
ata3l
a3tam
at3ank
at1apf
at2as
a2t1au
a3tau.
a2tä
at1än
4atb
at2c
4ate.
a2teb
ateien4
at1eig
3a2teli
a3tell
at2en
ate4na
atens4
a2tep
ate3r4al
atern2
ate2ru
4ates
at2eu
at2ex
at3hag
at2han
ath1in
3athl
a4thr
at2hu
4a3ti
ati3ka
ati4kab
a4tinf
at2is
ati2sa
ati2se
4atli
4atlo
3atm
4atma
4atmus
ato4man
ato4men
3atomk
ato2mo
at1ort
atra2t
at3rä
